en: Compatible refrigerator compartment: Crisper drawer; Deli drawer; Door; Freezer compartment; Fresh food compartment; Ice maker; Wine rack; Other
ru: Совместимое отделение холодильника: Ящик для овощей и фруктов; Ящик для деликатесов; Дверь; Морозильная камера; Отделение для свежих продуктов; Льдогенератор; Винная полка; Другое
nl: Compatibel koelkastcompartiment: Groentelade; Delicatessenlade; Deur; Vriesvak; Vershoudcompartiment; IJsmaker; Wijnrek; Overig
pt-BR: Compartimento de geladeira compatível: Gaveta para legumes; Gaveta de frios; Porta; Compartimento para freezer; Compartimento para alimentos Fresh; Máquina de fazer gelo; Garrafeira; Outro
tr: Uyumlu buzdolabı bölmesi: Sebzelik çekmecesi; Şarküteri çekmecesi; Kapı; Dondurucu bölmesi; Taze gıda bölmesi; Buz makinesi; Şarap rafı; Diğer
sl-SI: Združljiv predal hladilnika: Predal za sveže sadje in zelenjavo; Predal za delikatese; Vrata; Predal za zamrzovalnik; Predal za Fresh hrano; Aparat za led; Stojalo za vino; Druga
lt-LT: Suderinamas šaldytuvo skyrius: Traškių daržovių stalčius; Deli stalčius; Durys; Šaldiklių stalčius; Šviežio maisto skyrius; Ledo gaminimo aparatas; Vyno lentyna; Kita
ko: 호환 냉장고 구획: 야채 보관함; 신선 보관함; 도어; 냉동실; 신선 식품 칸; 제빙기; 와인 랙; 기타
da: Kompatibelt køleskabsrum: Grøntsagsskuffe; Delikatesseskuffe; Dør; Fryserrum; Afdeling af friske madvarer; Ismaskine; Vinreol; Andet
hu: Kompatibilis hűtőszekrény-rekesz: Frissentartó rekesz; Zöldség-/gyümölcstároló rekesz; Ajtó; Fagyasztórekesz; Friss élelmiszer rekesz; Jégkészítő; Borállvány; Egyéb
pt-PT: Compartimento de frigorífico compatível: Gaveta para legumes; Gaveta de frios; Porta; Compartimento do congelador; Compartimento para alimentos frescos; Máquina de gelo; Garrafeira; Outro
es: Compartimento frigorífico compatible: Cajón para verduras; Compartimento de delicatessen; Puerta; Compartimento para congelador; Compartimento de alimentos frescos; Máquina de hielo; Botellero; Otros
el: Συμβατό διαμέρισμα ψυγείου: Συρτάρι λαχανικών; Συρτάρι ντελικατέσεν; Πόρτα; Καταψύκτης; Θήκη φρέσκων τροφίμων; Παγομηχανή; Σχάρα κρασιών; Άλλο
ro-RO: Compartiment de frigider compatibil: Sertar pentru legume; Sertar pentru mezeluri; Ușă; Compartiment de congelator; Compartiment pentru alimente proaspete; Mașină de gheață; Raft pentru vinuri; Altele
th: ช่องแช่เย็นที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ช่องแช่ผัก/ผลไม้; ช่องแช่เนื้อสัตว์แปรรูป; ประตู; ช่องแช่แข็ง; ช่องแช่อาหารสด; เครื่องทำน้ำแข็ง; ชั้นวางไวน์; อื่นๆ
fi: Yhteensopiva jääkaappiosasto: Vihanneslokero; Leikkelelaatikko; Ovi; Pakastimen osasto; Tuorelokero; Jääpalakone; Viiniteline; Muu
sv: Kompatibelt kylskåpsfack: Grönsakslåda; Delikatesslåda; Dörr; Frysfack; Fack Fresh; Ismaskin; Vinställ; Övrigt
pl: Kompatybilna komora lodówki: Szuflada na warzywa; Szuflada delikatesowa; Drzwi; Komora zamrażarki; Komora na świeżą żywność; Kostkarka; Półka na wino; Pozostałe
fr: Compartiment du réfrigérateur compatible: Bac à légumes; Tiroir traiteur; Porte; Compartiment de congélateur; Compartiment pour aliments frais; Machine à glaçons; Casier à vin; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместимо хладилно отделение: Чекмедже за зеленчуци; Чекмедже за колбаси; Врата; Отделение на камерата; Отделение за свежа храна; Ледогенератор; Стойка за вино; Друго
cs: Kompatibilní část chladničky: Zásuvka na ovoce a zeleninu; Zásuvka na uzeniny a sýry; Dveře; Mrazák; Přihrádka na čerstvé potraviny; Výrobník ledu; Regál na víno; Jiné
zh-CN: 兼容的冰箱隔间: 保鲜抽屉; 熟食抽屉; 门体; 冷冻室; 冷藏室; 制冰机; 酒架; 其他
vi: Ngăn tủ lạnh tương thích: Ngăn đựng rau củ; Ngăn đựng thực phẩm chế biến sẵn; Cửa; Ngăn đông; Ngăn đựng thực phẩm tươi sống; Máy làm đá; Giá đựng rượu; Khác
de: Kompatibles Kühlschrankfach: Gemüsefach; Delikatessenschublade; Tür; Gefrierfach; Frischefach; Eismaschine; Weinregal; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 相容冰箱隔間: 保鮮抽屜; 熟食抽屜; 冰箱門; 冷凍室; 生鮮食品隔間; 製冰機; 葡萄酒架; 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilni odjeljak hladnjaka: Ladica za povrće; Ladica za delikatesne proizvode; Vrata; Odjeljak za zamrzavanje; Odjeljak za svježu hranu; Ledomat; Stalak za vino; Ostalo
nb: Kompatibelt kjøleskapsrom: Grønnsaksskuffen; Delikatessskuff; Dør; Fryseboks; Fresh; Ismaskin; Vinstativ; Annet
it: Scomparto frigorifero compatibile: Cassetto per frutta e verdura; Cassetto per prodotti da gastronomia; Porta; Scomparto congelatore; Scomparto per alimenti freschi; Macchina per il ghiaccio; Portavini; Altro
sk-SK: Kompatibilný chladiaci priestor: Zásuvka na ovocie a zeleninu; Zásuvka na údeniny a syry; Dvere; Priehradka mrazničky; Priehradka na čerstvé potraviny; Výrobník ľadu; Stojan na víno; Iné
ja: 互換性のある冷蔵室: 野菜室; デリ用ドロワー; ドア; 冷凍庫; フレッシュフードコンパートメント; 製氷機; ワインラック; その他